src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_to_noun.lexc
+LAAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>laalinnguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+LAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>laannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+LAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>laarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+LIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>liaq tp ;
+LIAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn:^T%>liaaraq Z1_qaZmorf ;
+LIAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>liaarannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+LIAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>liannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+LIAQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>liarujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+LIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>liassaq tp ;
+LIK+Der/nn: lik_nn ; !Z2+lZ
+LIK+Der/nn+ALUK+Der/nn:^T%>lialuk tup- ;
+LIK+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn:^T%>leeraq Z1_qaZmorf ;
+LIK+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>leerannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+LIK+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>liinnaq tup- ;
+LIK+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+RIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>liinnariaq tup- ;
+LIK+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>likasik tup- ;
+LIK+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>lippassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>lerujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+LIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>lissuaq Z2aqZ ;
+LIK+Der/nn+TAQ+Der/nn:^T%>littaq tp ;
+LIK+Der/nn+TSIAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>litsiarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+LLUINNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rluinnaq tup- ;
+MINIQ+Der/nn:^T%>mineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+MIU+Der/nn:%>miu tp ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn:%>mioq tp ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>miuinnaq tup- ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>miu Z2+lZ ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn@U.Num.Pl@:%>miorpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+QATE+Der/nn:%>mioqat tpt ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>miussaq tp ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>miorsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+MIUQ+Der/nn+TAQ+Der/nn:%>miortaq tp ;
+NGAJAK+Der/nn:^T%>ngajak tup- ;
+NGAJAK+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:^T%>ngajavik tup- ;
+NNAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>nnaaq tp ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>nnguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>nnguaannaq tup- ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>nnguinnaq tup- ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>nnguakasik tup- ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+KULUK+Der/nn:^T%>nnguakkuluk tup- ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+MIU+Der/nn:^T%>nnguarmiu tp ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+MIUQ+Der/nn:^T%>nnguarmioq tp ;
+NNGUAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>nnguassaq tp ;
+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+ALUK+Der/nn:^T%>rpaaluk@U.Num.Pl@ tup- ;
+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+ALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rpaalussuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:^T%>rpassua Z2+lZ ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>palaaq tp ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+KUJUUQ+Der/nn:^T%>palaakujooq tp ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>palaannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>palaarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PALAAQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:^T%>palaavik tup- ;
+PALLAK+Der/nn:^T%>rpallak tup- ;
+PALLAK+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rpallannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+PALLAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rpallassuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PALUK+Der/nn:^T%>rpaluk Z2aqZ ;
+PALUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rpalussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rpiaq tp ;
+PIAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rpiannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+PILUK+Der/nn:^T%>piluk tup- ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:^T%>pilu Z2+lZ ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>pilulerujuk tup- ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>pilulerujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>pilulissuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>pilorujuk tup- ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>pilorujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>pilussaq tp ;
+PILUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>pilussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+QATE+Der/nn:^T%>qat tpt ;
+QATE+Der/nn+GIIT+Der/nn:^T%>qatigiit GIIT ;
+QATE+Der/nn+GIIT@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/vv:^T%>qatigiiaraq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1_qaZmorf ;
+QATE+Der/nn+GIIT@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>qatigiiarannguaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z1nnguaqZ ;
+QQURTUUQ+Der/nn:^T%>qqortooq tp ;
+QQURTUUQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>qqortoorujuk tup- ;
+QQURTUUQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>qqortoorujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+QQURTUUQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>qqortoorsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+RALAAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ralaannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+RALAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ralaarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>rujuk tup- ;
+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn:%>siaq tp ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>siaannaq tup- ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn:%>siaannamineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>siaannannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>siassaq tp ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:%>siassaraluaq Z2aqZ ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn:%>siassamineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn:%>siassarsiaq tp ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+UTE+Der/nn:%>siassaat tpt ;
+SIAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>siarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SIUT+Der/nn:%>siut tpt ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>siuti Z2+lZ ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>siuterpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>siutissaq tp ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:%>siutissaraluaq Z2aqZ ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+TAQ+Der/nn:%>siutitaq tp ; !Ondi 20240212
+SIUT+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:%>siutivik tup- ;
+SIUT+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>siutivissaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssaraluaq Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssaraluarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssaannaq tup- ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:^T%>ssa Z2+lZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>ssalerujuk tup- ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssalerujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
!NB: Følgende 3 undtagelsesvist medtaget i morfemlex for at forebygge fejl af typen suleqat+SSAQ+SSAQ+ISUA/ILIQI
+SSAQ+Der/nn+ILIQI+Der/nv:^T%>ssaaleqi XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+ISUA+Der/nv+Orth/Arch:^T%>ssaasua IV_voq ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIUR+Der/nv:^T%>ssior IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssamineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:^T%>ssarpak@U.Num.Pl@ tup- ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssarpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+PAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:^T%>ssarpassua Z2+lZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssarujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssarsiaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+KKAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssarsiakkaaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssarsiamineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssarsiassaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssartaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TSIALAK+Der/nn:^T%>ssatsialak tup- ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssatuaq tp ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssatuannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssatoqaq Z1_qaZ ;
+SSAQ+Der/nn+TAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ssartaaq tp ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rsuaaraq Z1_qaZmorf ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>rsuaarakasik tup- ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>rsuakasik tup- ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+KKUT+Der/nn:^T%>rsuakkut ZkkutZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+LIAQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rsualiarujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+MIU+Der/nn:^T%>rsuarmiu tp ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>rsuarujuk tup- ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rsuarujussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rsuaasaaq tp ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rsuaarsaarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rsuaasaq tp ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+USAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>rsuaasarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+UTE+Der/nn:^T%>rsuaat tpt ;
+SUAQ+Der/nn+VIK+Der/nn:^T%>rsuavik tup- ;
+SUNNI+Der/nn:%>sunni tp ;
+SUNNI+Der/nn+ALAAQ+Der/nn:%>sunnialaaq tp ;
+SUNNI+Der/nn+ALAAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:%>sunnialaaginnaq tup- ;
+SUNNI+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>sunnersuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TAAQ+Der/nn:%>taaq tp ;
+TAAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>taassaq tp ;
+TAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>taarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn:%>taq tp ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:%>taraluaq   Z2aqZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+GASAAQ+Der/nn:%>tarasaaq tp ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+KASSAK+Der/nn:%>takassak tup- ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:%>takasik tup- ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:%>ta Z2+lZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>talissuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:%>tannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:%>tarpak@U.Num.Pl@ tup- ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+PAK@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:%>tarpassuaq@U.Num.Pl@ Z2aqZ ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+PILUK+Der/nn:%>tapiluk tup- ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:%>tassaq tp ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:%>tatuaq tp ;
+TSIALAK+Der/nn:^T%>tsialak tup- ;
+TSIALAK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>tsialassuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TSIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>tsiaq tup- ;
+TSIAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>tsiannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TSIAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>tsiarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>tuaq tp ;
+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>tuannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TUAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>tuarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TUGAQ+Der/nn:^T%>tugaq Z1_kaZ ;
+TUGAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>tugaannaq tup- ;
+TUQAQ+Der/nn:^T%>toqaq Z1_qaZ ;
+TUQAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>toqannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>toqarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+TUUQ+Der/nn:%>tooq tp ;
+TUUQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:%>tuukasik tup- ;
+USAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>usaaq tp ;
+USAAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>usaarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+USAQ+Der/nn:^T%>usaq tp ;
+USAQ+Der/nn+ARAQ+Der/nn:^T%>usaaraq Z1_qaZmorf ;
+USAQ+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>usakasik tup- ;
+USAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>usannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn:^T%>ut ute_nn ; !tpt
+UTE+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utinnguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utissaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>ussuaq Z2aqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitaaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqaq Z1_qaZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqapalaaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+RUJUK+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqarujuk tup- ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+GALUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassaraluaq Z2aqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+INNAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassaannaq tup- ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassa Z2+lZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+MINIQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassamineq Z2+rZmorf ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassarsiaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassarsiassaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TSIALAK+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassatsialak tup- ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn+NNGUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassatuannguaq Z1nnguaqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn+TUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqassatuaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqarsuaq Z2aqZ ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+PALAAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqarsuapalaaq tp ;
+UTE+Der/nn+TUQAQ+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>utitoqarsuassaq tp ;
+VVAARIK+Der/nn:^T%>ffaarik tup- ;
+VIK+Der/nn:^T%>vik tup- ;
+VIK+Der/nn+KASIK+Der/nn:^T%>vikasik tup- ;
+VIK+Der/nn+SIAQ+Der/nn+LIK+Der/nn:^T%>vissia Z2+lZ ; ! 'qitornavissialik'
+VIK+Der/nn+SSAQ+Der/nn:^T%>vissaq tp ;
+VIK+Der/nn+SUAQ+Der/nn:^T%>vissuaq Z2aqZ ;
